Hawaii statutes.
[§431M-7] Preservation of certain
benefits. Nothing in this chapter shall serve to prevent the offering or
acceptance of benefits required by this chapter. [L 1988, c 202, pt of §1, §3;
am L 1994, c 111, §4; am L 1998, c 78, §3; am L 2002, c 239, §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next